Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.510

Office of the education ombuds—Notification.

(1) Beginning August 1, 2023, public schools must:

(a) Provide students and their parents or guardians with a description of the services available through the office of the education ombuds and the contact information for the office of the education ombuds at the time of initial enrollment or admission; and

(b) Either: (i) Include on their website a description of the services available through the office of the education ombuds and a prominent link to the complaint resolution and referral access point maintained by the office of the education ombuds, described in RCW 43.06B.070; or (ii) provide a description of the services available through the office of the education ombuds and the contact information for the office of the education ombuds in existing materials that are shared annually with families, students, and school employees, such as welcome packets, orientation guides, and newsletters. This requirement as it relates to students and families may be satisfied by using the model student handbook language in RCW 28A.300.286.

(2) Public schools are encouraged to comply with both subsection (1)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section.

(3) By July 1, 2022, the office of the education ombuds must develop a template of the information described in subsection (1) of this section. The template must be translated into Spanish and into other languages as resources allow. The template must be made available upon request and updated as needed.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "public schools" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.

[ 2024 c 219 s 4; 2023 c 242 s 6; 2022 c 222 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2022 c 222: "(1) The legislature recognizes that the office of the education ombuds within the office of the governor was established by the legislature in 2006 to reduce educational opportunity gaps by supporting families, students, educators, and communities in understanding the K-12 school system and resolving concerns collaboratively. The legislature recognizes that it placed the education ombuds within the office of the governor to ensure independence and impartiality.

(2) The legislature further recognizes that the education ombuds provides services including:

(a) Informing students, parents or guardians, employees, and members of the public about the state's public elementary and secondary education system;

(b) Identifying obstacles and recommending strategies to help students and community members to participate effectively in schools;

(c) Identifying and recommending strategies for improving student success;

(d) Referring individuals and families to appropriate resources, agencies, or departments;

(e) Facilitating the resolution of informal complaints made by parents and students with regard to the state's public elementary and secondary education system; and

(f) Serving as the lead agency to provide resources and tools to parents and families about public school antiharassment policies and strategies.

(3) The legislature intends for public schools to annually notify parents or guardians, students, and school employees about these services." [ 2022 c 222 s 1.]